Texas statutes.
OCCUPATIONS CODE

TITLE 3. HEALTH PROFESSIONS

SUBTITLE G. PROFESSIONS RELATED TO HEARING, SPEECH, AND DYSLEXIA

CHAPTER 401. SPEECH-LANGUAGE PATHOLOGISTS AND AUDIOLOGISTS

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 401.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Advisory board" means the Speech-Language Pathologists and Audiologists Advisory Board.

(1-a) "Audiologist" means a person who meets the qualifications of this chapter to practice audiology.

(2) "Audiology" means the application of nonmedical principles, methods, and procedures for measurement, testing, appraisal, prediction, consultation, counseling, habilitation, rehabilitation, or instruction related to disorders of the auditory or vestibular systems for the purpose of providing or offering to provide services modifying communicative disorders involving speech, language, or auditory or vestibular function or other aberrant behavior relating to hearing loss.

(3) "Commission" means the Texas Commission of Licensing and Regulation.

(4) "Department" means the Texas Department of Licensing and Regulation.

(4-a) "Executive director" means the executive director of the department.

(4-b) "Fitting and dispensing hearing instruments," "hearing instrument," "over-the-counter hearing aid," and "sale" have the meanings assigned to those terms by Section 402.001.

(5) "Speech-language pathologist" means a person who meets the qualifications of this chapter to practice speech-language pathology.

(6) "Speech-language pathology" means the application of nonmedical principles, methods, and procedures for measurement, testing, evaluation, prediction, counseling, habilitation, rehabilitation, or instruction related to the development and disorders of communication, including speech, voice, language, oral pharyngeal function, or cognitive processes, for the purpose of evaluating, preventing, or modifying or offering to evaluate, prevent, or modify those disorders and conditions in an individual or a group.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 619 (S.B. 662), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 1.040, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 960 (S.B. 2017), Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 2023.

SUBCHAPTER B. APPLICATION OF CHAPTER

Sec. 401.051. PHYSICIANS. (a) This chapter does not prevent or restrict a physician from engaging in the practice of medicine in this state.

(b) This chapter does not restrict a licensed physician from personally conducting a speech or hearing test or evaluation.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 401.052. NURSES. This chapter does not prevent or restrict a communication, speech, language, or hearing screening, as defined by commission rule, from being conducted by a registered nurse:

(1) licensed in this state; and

(2) practicing in accordance with the standards of professional conduct and ethics established by rules adopted by the Texas Board of Nursing.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 889 (H.B. 2426), Sec. 46, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 1.041, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 401.053. PERSONS TRAINED BY DEPARTMENT OF STATE HEALTH SERVICES. (a) This chapter does not apply to a person who shows evidence of having received training by the Department of State Health Services in a communication, speech, language, or hearing screening training program approved by that department if the person's activity is limited to screening as defined by commission rule.

(b) A person who has received training by the Department of State Health Services in a program under Subsection (a) may not:

(1) practice speech-language pathology or audiology; or

(2) represent that the person is a speech-language pathologist or audiologist.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 1.042, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 401.054. PERSONS CERTIFIED BY TEXAS EDUCATION AGENCY. (a) This chapter does not prevent or restrict the activities and services or the use of an official title by a person who is certified in speech-language pathology by the Texas Education Agency if the person only performs speech-language pathology or audiology services as part of the person's duties within an agency, institution, or organization under the jurisdiction of the Texas Education Agency.

(b) The Texas Education Agency certificate in speech-language pathology must require an applicant to:

(1) hold a master's degree in communicative disorders or the equivalent from a university program accredited by the American Speech-Language-Hearing Association; and

(2) pass a national examination in speech-language pathology or audiology approved by the department.

(c) A person affected by this section who performs work as a speech-language pathologist or audiologist in addition to performing the person's duties within an agency, institution, or organization under the jurisdiction of the Texas Education Agency is required to hold a license issued by the department unless that work is limited to speech and hearing screening procedures performed without compensation.

(d) For the purposes of Subsection (b)(1), an applicant's educational credentials are equivalent to a master's degree in communicative disorders if the credentials:

(1) consist of graduate-level course work and practicum from a program accredited by the American Speech-Language-Hearing Association; and

(2) meet requirements that are the same as those established by the department for a license in speech-language pathology or audiology.

(e) The clinical fellowship year experience or internship may not be a requirement for the Texas Education Agency certificate in speech-language pathology.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 1.043, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 401.055. UNIVERSITY OR COLLEGE TEACHERS. This chapter does not restrict the use of an official title by a person teaching in a university or college training program, if the person:

(1) is not engaged in the practice of speech-language pathology or audiology; and

(2) does not supervise a person engaged in the practice of speech-language pathology or audiology.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 401.056. STUDENTS. This chapter does not restrict the activities and services of a student pursuing a course of study leading to a degree in speech-language pathology or audiology at a college or university accredited by the Southern Association of Colleges and Universities or its equivalent if:

(1) the activities and services are part of the student's supervised course of study;

(2) the student is supervised by a person licensed under this chapter; and

(3) the student is designated as a "Speech-Language Pathology Trainee," an "Audiology Trainee," or by another title that clearly indicates the student's professional preparation status.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 401.057. HEARING CONSERVATION PROGRAM. This chapter does not prevent a person in an industrial setting from engaging in hearing testing as a part of a hearing conservation program in compliance with federal Occupational Safety and Health Administration regulations.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 40 (S.B. 312), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 401.058. APPLICATION TO HEARING INSTRUMENT FITTERS AND DISPENSERS. (a) This chapter does not prohibit, prevent, or restrict a person licensed under Chapter 402 from engaging in the practice of fitting and dispensing hearing instruments.

(b) Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 960 (S.B. 2017), Sec. 9, eff. June 18, 2023.

(c) A person who is not an audiologist who is licensed to fit and dispense hearing instruments under Chapter 402 may not:

(1) practice speech-language pathology or audiology; or

(2) represent that the person is a speech-language pathologist or audiologist by the use of any term restricted by this chapter.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 960 (S.B. 2017), Sec. 2, eff. June 18, 2023.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 960 (S.B. 2017), Sec. 9, eff. June 18, 2023.

Sec. 401.059. APPLICATION TO OTHER LICENSED PROFESSIONALS. This chapter does not prevent a person licensed in this state under another law from engaging in the profession for which the person is licensed.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 401.060. MEDICAL PRACTICE. This chapter does not permit a person to perform an act that violates Subtitle B.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 401.061. OVER-THE-COUNTER HEARING AIDS. (a) Except as provided by this section, this chapter does not apply to servicing, marketing, selling, dispensing, providing customer support for, acquiring, or distributing over-the-counter hearing aids, regardless of whether the transaction occurs in person, online, or through other means.

(b) A person is not required to obtain a license under this chapter or Chapter 402 to engage in an activity described by Subsection (a).

(c) A person may not use the title "licensed dispenser" or "licensed seller" with respect to over-the-counter hearing aids or otherwise represent that the person holds a license to sell or dispense over-the-counter hearing aids unless the person is licensed as an audiologist or audiologist intern under this chapter or as a hearing instrument fitter and dispenser under Chapter 402.

(d) The supervision, prescription, order, involvement, or intervention of a person licensed in this state is not required under this chapter for a consumer to access over-the-counter hearing aids.

(e) A person licensed under this chapter may service, market, sell, dispense, provide customer support for, or distribute over-the-counter hearing aids. These activities do not exempt a person licensed under this chapter from any applicable provision of this chapter or Chapter 402.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 960 (S.B. 2017), Sec. 3, eff. June 18, 2023.

SUBCHAPTER C. SPEECH-LANGUAGE PATHOLOGISTS AND AUDIOLOGISTS ADVISORY BOARD

Sec. 401.102. ADVISORY BOARD MEMBERSHIP. (a) The advisory board consists of nine members appointed by the presiding officer of the commission with the approval of the commission as follows:

(1) three audiologist members;

(2) three speech-language pathologist members; and

(3) three members who represent the public.

(b) Advisory board members must:

(1) be from the various geographic regions of the state; and

(2) be from varying employment settings.

(c) The advisory board members appointed under Subsections (a)(1) and (2) must:

(1) have been engaged in teaching, research, or providing services in speech-language pathology or audiology for at least five years; and

(2) be licensed under this chapter.

(d) One of the public advisory board members must be a physician licensed in this state and certified in otolaryngology or pediatrics.

(e) Appointments to the advisory board shall be made without regard to the race, creed, sex, religion, or national origin of the appointee.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 1.045, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1105 (H.B. 4007), Sec. 2.001, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 401.10205. DUTIES OF ADVISORY BOARD. The advisory board shall provide advice and recommendations to the department on technical matters relevant to the administration of this chapter.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 1.046, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 401.105. TERMS; VACANCIES. (a) Members are appointed for staggered six-year terms. The terms of three members expire September 1 of each odd-numbered year.

(b) If a vacancy occurs during a member's term, the presiding officer of the commission, with the commission's approval, shall appoint a replacement who meets the qualifications for the vacant position to serve for the remainder of the term.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 1.047, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 1.048, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 401.107. PRESIDING OFFICER. (a) The presiding officer of the commission shall designate a member of the advisory board to serve as the presiding officer of the advisory board for a term of one year.

(b) The presiding officer of the advisory board may vote on any matter before the advisory board.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 619 (S.B. 662), Sec. 6, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 1.049, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 401.108. MEETINGS. The advisory board shall meet at the call of the presiding officer of the commission or the executive director.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 1.050, eff. September 1, 2015.

SUBCHAPTER E. POWERS AND DUTIES

Sec. 401.201. GENERAL POWERS AND DUTIES.

(a) The executive director shall administer and enforce this chapter.

(a-1) The department shall:

(1) evaluate the qualifications of license applicants;

(2) provide for the examination of license applicants;

(3) in connection with a hearing under this chapter, issue subpoenas, examine witnesses, and administer oaths under the laws of this state; and

(4) investigate persons engaging in practices that violate this chapter.

(b) Repealed by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 , Sec. 1.222(35), eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.171(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 1.052, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 1.222(35), eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 401.202. STANDARDS OF ETHICAL PRACTICE. The commission shall adopt rules under this chapter that establish standards of ethical practice.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 1.053, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 401.2021. RULES FOR HEARING INSTRUMENTS. With the assistance of the advisory board and the Hearing Instrument Fitters and Dispensers Advisory Board, the commission shall adopt rules to establish requirements for each sale of a hearing instrument for purposes of this chapter and Chapter 402. The rules must:

(1) address:

(A) the information and other provisions required in each written contract for the purchase of a hearing instrument;

(B) records that must be retained under this chapter or Chapter 402; and

(C) guidelines for the 30-day trial period during which a person may cancel the purchase of a hearing instrument; and

(2) require that the written contract and 30-day trial period information provided to a purchaser of a hearing instrument be in plain language designed to be easily understood by the average consumer.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 619 (S.B. 662), Sec. 8, eff. September 1, 2011.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 1.054, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 401.203. ASSISTANCE FILING COMPLAINT. (a) Repealed by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 , Sec. 1.222(36), eff. September 1, 2015.

(b) Repealed by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 , Sec. 1.222(36), eff. September 1, 2015.

(c) The department shall provide reasonable assistance to a person who wishes to file a complaint with the department regarding a person or activity regulated under this chapter.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 1.056, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 1.057, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 1.222(36), eff. September 1, 2015.

SUBCHAPTER F. PUBLIC ACCESS AND INFORMATION

Sec. 401.251. TELEPHONE NUMBER FOR COMPLAINTS. The department shall list with its regular telephone number any toll-free telephone number established under other state law that may be called to present a complaint about a health professional.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 1.058, eff. September 1, 2015.

SUBCHAPTER G. LICENSE REQUIREMENTS

Sec. 401.301. LICENSE REQUIRED. A person may not practice speech-language pathology or audiology or represent that the person is a speech-language pathologist or audiologist in this state unless the person holds a license under this chapter.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 401.302. ISSUANCE OF LICENSE. (a) The department shall issue a license to an applicant who meets the requirements of this chapter and who pays to the department the initial nonrefundable license fee.

(b) The department may issue to an applicant a license in either speech-language pathology or audiology.

(c) The department may issue a license in both speech-language pathology and audiology to an applicant.

(d) The commission by rule shall establish qualifications for dual licensing in speech-language pathology and audiology and may develop a full range of licensing options and establish rules for qualifications.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 1.063, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 401.303. LICENSE APPLICATION. (a) A person who desires a license under this chapter must apply to the department on a form and in the manner prescribed by the executive director.

(b) The application must be accompanied by a nonrefundable application fee.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 1.064, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 401.304. APPLICANT ELIGIBILITY. (a) To be eligible for licensing as a speech-language pathologist or audiologist, an applicant must:

(1) if the application is for a license in:

(A) speech-language pathology, possess at least a master's degree with a major in at least one of the areas of communicative sciences or disorders from a program accredited by a national accrediting organization that is approved by the commission or department and recognized by the United States secretary of education under the Higher Education Act of 1965 (20 U.S.C. Section 1001 et seq.) in an accredited or approved college or university; or

(B) audiology, possess at least a doctoral degree in audiology or a related hearing science from a program accredited by a national accrediting organization that is approved by the commission or department and recognized by the United States secretary of education under the Higher Education Act of 1965 (20 U.S.C. Section 1001 et seq.) in an accredited or approved college or university;

(2) submit a transcript from a public or private institution of higher learning showing successful completion of course work in amounts set by the commission by rule in:

(A) normal development and use of speech, language, and hearing;

(B) evaluation, habilitation, and rehabilitation of speech, language, and hearing disorders; and

(C) related fields that augment the work of clinical practitioners of speech-language pathology and audiology;

(3) have successfully completed at least 36 semester hours in courses that are acceptable toward a graduate degree by the college or university in which the courses are taken, at least 24 of which must be in the professional area for which the license is requested;

(4) have completed the minimum number of hours, established by the commission by rule, of supervised clinical experience with persons who present a variety of communication disorders; and

(5) have completed the full-time supervised professional experience, as defined by commission rule, in which clinical work has been accomplished in the major professional area for which the license is being sought.

(b) Clinical experience required under Subsection (a)(4) must be obtained:

(1) in the applicant's educational institution or in one of the institution's cooperating programs; and

(2) under the supervision of a person holding a license to practice speech-language pathology or audiology.

(c) Supervised professional experience under Subsection (a)(5) must:

(1) be under the supervision of a qualified person acceptable to the department under guidelines approved by the commission; and

(2) begin after completion of the academic and clinical experience required by this section.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 617 (S.B. 613), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 40 (S.B. 312), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 1.065, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 401.3041. CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD INFORMATION REQUIREMENT FOR LICENSE ISSUANCE. (a) The department shall require that an applicant for a license submit a complete and legible set of fingerprints, on a form prescribed by the department, to the department or to the Department of Public Safety for the purpose of obtaining criminal history record information from the Department of Public Safety and the Federal Bureau of Investigation.

(b) The department may not issue a license to a person who does not comply with the requirement of Subsection (a).

(c) The department shall conduct a criminal history check of each applicant for a license using information:

(1) provided by the individual under this section; and

(2) made available to the department by the Department of Public Safety, the Federal Bureau of Investigation, and any other criminal justice agency under Chapter 411, Government Code.

(d) The department may:

(1) enter into an agreement with the Department of Public Safety to administer a criminal history check required under this section; and

(2) authorize the Department of Public Safety to collect from each applicant the costs incurred by the Department of Public Safety in conducting the criminal history check.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 619 (S.B. 662), Sec. 9, eff. September 1, 2011.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 1.066, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 401.305. EXAMINATION. (a) To obtain a license, an applicant must:

(1) pass an examination approved by the commission by rule; and

(2) pay fees in a manner prescribed by the commission by rule.

(b) The department shall administer or provide for the administration of an examination at least twice each year.

(b-1) The commission by rule shall determine standards for acceptable performance on the examination.

(c) The commission by rule may:

(1) establish procedures for the administration of the examination; and

(2) require a written or oral examination, or both.

(d) The commission by rule may require the examination of an applicant in any theoretical or applied field of speech-language pathology or audiology it considers appropriate. The commission by rule may require the examination of an applicant on professional skills and judgment in the use of speech-language pathology or audiology techniques or methods.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 1.067, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1105 (H.B. 4007), Sec. 2.002, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 401.308. PROVISIONAL LICENSE; CERTIFICATE OF CLINICAL COMPETENCE WAIVER. (a) The department may grant a provisional license to an applicant who:

(1) is licensed in good standing as a speech-language pathologist or an audiologist in another state that has licensing requirements that are substantially equivalent to the requirements of this chapter;

(2) has passed a national or other examination recognized by the department relating to speech-language pathology or audiology; and

(3) is sponsored by a license holder with whom the provisional license holder may practice under this section.

(b) An applicant for a provisional license may be excused from the requirement of Subsection (a)(3) if the department determines that compliance with that requirement is a hardship to the applicant.

(c) A provisional license is valid until the date the department approves or denies the provisional license holder's application for a license.

(d) The department shall issue a license under this chapter to a provisional license holder:

(1) who passes the examination required by Section 401.305;

(2) for whom the department verifies satisfaction of the academic and experience requirements for a license under this chapter; and

(3) who satisfies any other license requirements under this chapter.

(e) The department shall complete the processing of a provisional license holder's application for a license not later than the 180th day after the date the provisional license is issued.

(f) The department may waive the examination requirement and issue a license to an applicant who holds the Certificate of Clinical Competence of the American Speech-Language-Hearing Association.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 1.069, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 401.311. INTERN LICENSE. (a) A license applicant who has completed only the requirements of Sections 401.304(a)(1)-(4) may be licensed as an intern under this chapter.

(b) An applicant who has successfully completed the academic and clinical requirements of Sections 401.304(a)(1)-(4) but who has not had the degree officially conferred on the applicant may be licensed as an intern under this chapter.

(c) The commission by rule shall:

(1) prescribe the terms governing a person's practice as an intern under this section; and

(2) establish general guidelines and renewal procedures for the holder of an intern license.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 1.071, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 401.312. LICENSED ASSISTANTS. (a) The commission by rule may establish minimum qualifications for licensed assistants in speech-language pathology and in audiology.

(b) A licensed assistant in speech-language pathology or in audiology must meet the minimum qualifications established by the commission.

(c) A licensed assistant in speech-language pathology shall work under the direction of a licensed speech-language pathologist.

(d) The qualifications for licensing as a licensed assistant in speech-language pathology must be uniform and be less stringent than the requirements under this chapter for a speech-language pathologist license.

(e) A licensed assistant in audiology shall work under the direction of a licensed audiologist.

(f) The qualifications for licensing as a licensed assistant in audiology must be uniform and be less stringent than the requirements under this chapter for an audiologist license.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 1.072, eff. September 1, 2015.

SUBCHAPTER H. LICENSE EXPIRATION AND RENEWAL

Sec. 401.351. LICENSE TERM. A license issued under this chapter is valid for two years.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 5.048, eff. April 2, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 1.073, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 401.352. LICENSE RENEWAL. (a) Each licensed speech-language pathologist or audiologist must pay the nonrefundable fee for license renewal.

(b) Repealed by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 , Sec. 1.222(49), eff. September 1, 2015.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 , Sec. 1.222(49), eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 5.049, eff. April 2, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 1.074, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 1.222(49), eff. September 1, 2015.

SUBCHAPTER I. PRACTICE BY LICENSE HOLDER

Sec. 401.401. AUDIOMETRIC TESTING. (a) If audiometric testing is not conducted in a stationary acoustical enclosure, sound-level measurements must be conducted at the time of the testing to ensure that ambient noise levels meet permissible standards for testing threshold to 20 dB based on the most recent American National Standards Institute "ears covered" octave band criteria for permissible ambient noise levels during audiometric testing.

(b) A dBa equivalent level may be used to determine compliance.

(c) The commission shall adopt rules necessary to enforce this section.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 1.076, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 401.402. PRACTICE BY SPEECH-LANGUAGE PATHOLOGISTS. (a) A speech-language pathologist may perform basic audiometric screening tests and aural habilitation or rehabilitation.

(b) A person licensed as a speech-language pathologist under this chapter may not fit or dispense hearing instruments unless the person meets the specific requirements for fitting and dispensing hearing instruments under this chapter or Chapter 402.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1105 (H.B. 4007), Sec. 2.003, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 401.403. PRACTICE BY AUDIOLOGISTS. (a) An audiologist may:

(1) engage in any act necessary to:

(A) evaluate hearing;

(B) train in the use of amplification, including hearing instruments;

(C) make earmolds for hearing instruments;

(D) fit, dispense, and sell hearing instruments; or

(E) manage cerumen;

(2) participate in consultation regarding noise control and hearing conservation;

(3) provide evaluations of environment or equipment, including calibration of equipment used in testing auditory functioning and hearing conservation; and

(4) perform basic speech and language screening tests and procedures consistent with the audiologist's training.

(b) A person who holds a license as an audiologist or audiologist intern and who fits and dispenses hearing instruments must:

(1) comply with rules adopted under this chapter related to fitting and dispensing hearing instruments;

(2) comply with the federal Food and Drug Administration rules and guidelines for fitting and dispensing hearing instruments;

(3) when providing services in this state, use a written contract that contains the information prescribed by commission rule; and

(4) follow the guidelines adopted by commission rule for a 30-day trial period on every hearing instrument purchased.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 1.077, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1144 (H.B. 2847), Sec. 10.001, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 960 (S.B. 2017), Sec. 4, eff. June 18, 2023.

Sec. 401.404. HEARING INSTRUMENT SALES TO MINORS. A licensed audiologist may not sell a hearing instrument to a person under 18 years of age unless the person or the parent or guardian of the person presents to the audiologist a written statement signed by a licensed physician who specializes in diseases of the ear stating that:

(1) the person's hearing loss has been medically evaluated during the six-month period preceding the date the statement is presented; and

(2) the person may be considered a candidate for a hearing instrument.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

SUBCHAPTER J. LICENSE DENIAL AND DISCIPLINARY PROCEDURES

Sec. 401.451. GROUNDS FOR LICENSE DENIAL AND DISCIPLINARY ACTION. (a) After a hearing, the commission or executive director may deny a license to an applicant or may suspend or revoke a person's license or place on probation a license holder if the applicant or license holder:

(1) violates this chapter or an order issued or rule adopted under this chapter;

(2) obtains a license by means of fraud, misrepresentation, or concealment of a material fact;

(3) sells, barters, or offers to sell or barter a license or certificate of registration; or

(4) engages in unprofessional conduct that:

(A) endangers or is likely to endanger the health, welfare, or safety of the public as defined by commission rule; or

(B) violates the code of ethics adopted and published by the commission.

(b) Repealed by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 , Sec. 1.222(53), eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 1.078, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 1.222(53), eff. September 1, 2015.

SUBCHAPTER K. PENALTIES AND OTHER ENFORCEMENT PROVISIONS

Sec. 401.501. DECEPTIVE TRADE PRACTICE. A violation of Section 401.301 is a deceptive trade practice.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 401.5021. REFUND. The commission or executive director may order an audiologist to pay a refund to a consumer who returns a hearing instrument during the 30-day trial period required by rules adopted under Section 401.2021.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 619 (S.B. 662), Sec. 12, eff. September 1, 2011.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 1.080, eff. September 1, 2015.